Washington statutes.
RCW 36.18.005

Definitions.

The definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Recording officer" means the county auditor, or in charter counties the county official charged with the responsibility for recording instruments in the county records.

(2) "File," "filed," or "filing" means the act of delivering an instrument to the auditor or recording officer for recording into the official public records.

(3) "Record," "recorded," or "recording" means the process, such as electronic, mechanical, optical, magnetic, or microfilm storage used by the auditor or recording officer after filing to incorporate the instrument into the public records.

(4) "Multiple transactions" means a document that contains two or more titles and/or two or more transactions requiring multiple indexing.

[ 1999 c 233 s 2; 1991 c 26 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1999 c 233: See note following RCW 4.28.320.